New York, session 2025-2026, A9423.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 163 of the general business law is REPEALED. 2 § 2. Sections 203-a and 203-b of the labor law are REPEALED. 3 § 3. The closing paragraph of subdivision 1 of section 105 of the 4 civil service law is REPEALED. 5 § 4. Section 13-aa of the domestic relations law is REPEALED. 6 § 5. Subdivision 1 of section 306 of the education law, as amended by 7 chapter 298 of the laws of 1957, is amended to read as follows: 8 1. Whenever it shall be proved to [his] their satisfaction that any 9 trustee, member of a board of education, clerk, collector, treasurer, 10 district superintendent, superintendent of schools or other school offi- 11 cer [is a member of an organization listed as subversive by the board of 12 regents pursuant to the provisions of section three thousand twenty-two 13 of this chapter, or] has been guilty of any wilful violation or neglect 14 of duty under this chapter, or any other act pertaining to common 15 schools or other educational institution participating in state funds, 16 or wilfully disobeying any decision, order, rule or regulation of the 17 regents or of the commissioner of education, said commissioner, after a EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14027-07-6 A. 9423--A 2 1 hearing at which the school officer shall have the right of represen- 2 tation by counsel, may, by an order under [his] their hand and seal, 3 which order shall be recorded in [his] their office, remove such school 4 officer from [his] their office. 5 § 6. Section 704 of the education law is REPEALED. 6 § 7. Section 4109 of the education law is REPEALED. 7 § 8. Section 4111 of the education law is REPEALED. 8 § 9. Section 8 of the executive law is REPEALED. 9 § 10. Subdivision 1 of section 184 of the general business law, as 10 amended by chapter 834 of the laws of 1965, is amended to read as 11 follows: 12 1. No employment agency, directly or indirectly, shall accept applica- 13 tions from persons who reside in a state outside New York, procure or 14 offer to procure employment of persons as domestic or household employ- 15 ees who are residing in states outside of this state previous to their 16 application for employment, except as provided in this section and in 17 the applicable provisions of other sections of this article. [As used in 18 this section, the term "state" applies to the forty-eight states on this 19 continent, and the District of Columbia, but does not include the state 20 of Alaska.] 21 § 11. The opening paragraph of paragraph (a) of subdivision 7 of 22 section 75 of the public lands law, as amended by chapter 703 of the 23 laws of 1994, is amended to read as follows: 24 The commissioner of general services may grant in perpetuity or other- 25 wise, to the owners of the land adjacent to the land underwater speci- 26 fied in this section, to promote the commerce of this state or for the 27 purpose of beneficial enjoyment thereof by such owners, or for agricul- 28 tural purposes, or for public park, beach, street, highway, parkway, 29 playground, recreation or conservation purposes, so much of said land 30 underwater as the commissioner deems necessary for that purpose. No such 31 grant shall be made to any person other than the proprietor of the adja- 32 cent land. Any such grant made to any other person shall be void, except 33 that, subject to the other provisions of this section, the commissioner 34 of general services may transfer jurisdiction over state-owned lands 35 underwater to a state agency for the purpose of protecting environ- 36 mentally sensitive lands underwater even if the state agency is not the 37 proprietor of the adjacent upland. The commissioner may also lease such 38 land underwater to such owner of the adjacent upland or, with the 39 consent of such owner of the adjacent upland, to others, for terms up to 40 forty years. No such grant or lease shall be made of any lands belonging 41 to the city of New York[, or so as to interfere with the rights of that 42 city or of the Hudson River Railroad Company, or of its successor the 43 New York Central and Hudson River Railroad Company]. In making any 44 grant, lease, permit or other conveyance, the commissioner of general 45 services shall, upon administrative findings, and to the extent practi- 46 cable, reserve such interests or attach such conditions to preserve the 47 public interest in use of state-owned lands underwater and waterways for 48 navigation, commerce, fishing, bathing, recreation, environmental 49 protection and access to the navigable waters of the state, with due 50 regard for the need of affected owners of private property to safeguard 51 their property. The commissioner shall by official rules establish 52 criteria and guidelines for determinations with respect to the leasing 53 or selling of such lands underwater. 54 § 12. This act shall take effect immediately.